Colorado, session 2026A, SB038.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 23-31-103 as
follows:
23-31-103. Board to control college and lands.
The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has
the general control and supervision of the Colorado state university and
lands and the use thereof, which may be vested in the university by state
or national legislation and of all appropriations made by the state for the
support of the same. The board has plenary power to adopt all such
ordinances, bylaws, and regulations, not in conflict with the law, as they
may deem THE BOARD DEEMS necessary to secure the successful operation
of the university and promote the designed objects. FOR PROPERTY UNDER
CONTROL OF THE BOARD PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 31 THAT IS WITHIN
THE JURISDICTION OF A CITY OR COUNTY, THE BOARD SHALL COMPLY WITH
A NOISE OR SIGN ORDINANCE IMPOSED BY THE CITY OR COUNTY FOR NOISE
THAT IS AUDIBLE OR SIGNS THAT ARE VISIBLE, OUTSIDE PROPERTY UNDER
CONTROL OF THE BOARD, UNLESS OTHERWISE GRANTED A WAIVER BY THE
RELEVANT CITY OR COUNTY.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-2- SB26-038